New Jersey, session 222, S3780.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a school district may provide virtual or remote instruction to students who attend a public school that is used as a polling place for the special election to be held on April 16, 2026, to fill the vacancy in the United States House of Representatives in the 11th Congressional District.  The program of virtual or remote instruction permitted pursuant to this subsection shall only be provided on the day of the special election.  A school district shall ensure that all students have access to a computer or to sufficient broadband, or to any other technology required prior to permitting the public school to offer virtual or remote instruction to students pursuant to this subsection.  The program of virtual or remote instruction provided by a school district pursuant to this subsection shall be consistent with the program of virtual or remote instruction submitted to the Commissioner of Education pursuant to subsection b. of section 9 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-9).  The superintendent of schools shall have the authority to implement the school district's program of virtual or remote instruction and consult with the board of education prior to the decision to institute the program of virtual or remote instruction if practicable.  The superintendent shall ensure that students, parents, staff, and the board of education are informed promptly of the superintendent's decision. b.  A school district that is permitted to provide virtual or remote instruction to students pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall not be required to offer a combination of in-person and virtual or remote instruction on the day of the special election. c.  Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-9) or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Education shall allow a school district that provides virtual or remote instruction pursuant to subsection a. of this section to apply the day of virtual or remote instruction to the 180-day requirement established pursuant to subsection a. of section 9 of P.L.1996, c.138 (C.18A:7F-9).  A day of virtual or remote instruction, if instituted pursuant to this section, shall be considered the equivalent of a full day of school attendance for the purposes of meeting State and local graduation requirements, the awarding of course credit, and such other matters as determined by the commissioner. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.